local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
   <pardef n="personal_pronouns__enc">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ме</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>те</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ни</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ве</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ги</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ми</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ти</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ни</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ви</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>им</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="што__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ко/ј__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ј</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <!-- Именки -->

   <pardef n="книг/а__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="молив__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="маж__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="снег__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ови</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="речни/к__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>к</l>
         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ци</l>
         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="колег/а__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="жен/а__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ка/ва__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ва</l>
         <r>ва<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>фиња</l>
         <r>ва<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="пристаништ/е__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>



   <pardef n="пенкал/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="град__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ови</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ог/ан__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ан</l>
         <r>ан<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нови</l>
         <r>ан<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="вет/ар__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ар</l>
         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рови</l>
         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="бра/т__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>т</l>
         <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ќа</l>
         <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ра/ка__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ка</l>
         <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>це</l>
         <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <e lm="clitic personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__enc"/></e>
   <e lm="кој"><i>ко</i><par n="ко/ј__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="што"><i>што</i><par n="што__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="пристаниште"><i>пристаништ</i><par n="пристаништ/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="прозор"><i>прозор</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="живот"><i>живот</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="аеродром"><i>аеродром</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="молив"><i>молив</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="грамофон"><i>грамофон</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="студент"><i>студент</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="лекар"><i>лекар</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="администратор"><i>администратор</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="маж"><i>маж</i><par n="маж__n"/></e>
   <e lm="снег"><i>маж</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="речник"><i>речни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ученик"><i>учени</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="пенкало"><i>пенкал</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="место"><i>мест</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="пиво"><i>пив</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="колега"><i>колег</i><par n="колег/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="книга"><i>книг</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="плажа"><i>плаж</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="цигара"><i>цигар</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="жена"><i>жен</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="книжарница"><i>книжарниц</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="град"><i>град</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="нож"><i>нож</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="оган"><i>ог</i><par n="ог/ан__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ветар"><i>вет</i><par n="вет/ар__n"/></e>
   <e lm="брат"><i>бра</i><par n="бра/т__n"/></e>
   <e lm="рака"><i>ра</i><par n="ра/ка__n"/></e>
   <e lm="кава"><i>ка</i><par n="ка/ва__n"/></e>
